Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.125

Deadline for submission of candidate statements and photographs.

The secretary may, by rule, set a deadline for submission of candidate statements and photographs for inclusion in the statewide voters' pamphlet. The deadline for submission of candidate statements and photographs must be not sooner than 11 days immediately following the deadline for filing declarations of candidacy under RCW 29A.24.050.

[ 2023 c 394 s 9.]